Hawaii statutes.
§604-6.1 Jurisdiction of district courts;
leased or rented personal property. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the
district courts to try all cases resulting from the retention of leased or
rented personal property, the value of which does not exceed $5,000. [L 1980, c
171, §3; am L 1981, c 176, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next